Utah statutes.
76-6-1105.   Unlawful possession of another's identification documents.
(1)  For purposes of this section "identifying document" means:
(a)  a government issued identifying document;
(b)  a vehicle registration certificate; or
(c)  any other document containing personal identifying information as defined
in Subsections 76-6-1102(1)(d) through (k).
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 76-6-1102(3), a person
is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if he:
(i)  obtains or possesses an identifying document with knowledge that he is
not entitled to obtain or possess the identifying document; or
(ii)  assists another person in obtaining or possessing an identifying
document with knowledge that the person is not entitled to obtain or possess
the identifying document.
(b)  A person is guilty of a third degree felony if he:
(i)  obtains or possesses multiple identifying documents with knowledge that
he is not entitled to obtain or possess the multiple identifying documents; or
(ii)  assists another person in obtaining or possessing multiple identifying
documents with knowledge that the person is not entitled to obtain or possess
the multiple identifying documents.
(c)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(b), "multiple identifying documents" means
identifying documents of two or more people.
